src/morphology/inflection/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON AcronymStem/äX
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ää	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ään	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/y
	AcronymStem/Y	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Y
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ž
    AcronymStem/Z   ;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Ž
    AcronymStem/Z   ;

LEXICON AcronymStem/z
    AcronymStem/Z   ;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Z
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:aa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:aan	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ja	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ä
	AcronymStem/Ä	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Ä
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hän	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ö
	AcronymStem/Ö	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Ö
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hön	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/0
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^a}	DigitStem10	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/1
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^y}{^i}	DigitStem31	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/2
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^a}{^i}	DigitStem31	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/3
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^o}{^e}	DigitStem7	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/4
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^ä}	DigitStem10	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/5
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^i}	DigitStem27	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/6
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^u}{^i}	DigitStem27	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/7
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^ä}	DigitStem10	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/8
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^a}	DigitStem10	;

LEXICON AcronymDigitStem/9
	AcronymStem/Common	;
0:{^ä}	DigitStem10	;
